Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.206

Allocation of distributions.

Distributions of a limited liability company are made to the members, and to classes or groups of members, in the manner provided in a limited liability company agreement. If the limited liability company agreement does not so provide, distributions are made in proportion to the agreed value of the contributions made and any contributions required to be made, but not yet made, by each member.

[ 2015 c 188 s 41.]